Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,158
Internal credentialing program.

The internal credentialing program shall include for each health care staff member being considered for employment or retention (1) an investigation of the history of the health care staff member using (a) when possible, the national practitioner data bank under the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. 11101 et seq., as such act existed on September 1, 2001, and (b) contacts with prior employers of the health care staff member and (2) confirmation of all professional permits, licenses, or other authorizations to practice of the health care staff member. The medical director shall maintain a credentialing file for all health care staff members employed by the department. The medical director shall ensure the recredentialing of each health care staff member employed by the department every two years.

Laws 2001, LB 154, § 6.